Illinois, session 104th, SB3933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 155.23 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/155.23)  (from Ch. 73, par. 767.23)7    Sec. 155.23. Fraud reporting. 8    (1) Any insurer, as defined in Section 155.24 of this 9Code, doing business in the State of Illinois that has 10reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud which is or 11may be a crime under Illinois law has been, is being, or is 12about to be committed shall furnish and disclose the knowledge 13and information to:14        (A) the Attorney General;15        (B) the National Insurance Crime Bureau; or16        (C) the National Association of Insurance 17    Commissioners, which shall disclose the information to the 18    Attorney General and cooperate fully with any 19    investigation conducted by the Attorney General. 20The Director is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules 21requiring insurers, as defined in Section 155.24, doing 22business in the State of Illinois to report factual 23information in their possession that is pertinent to suspected   SB3933- 2 -LRB104 19319 BAB 32765 b1fraudulent insurance claims, fraudulent insurance 2applications, or premium fraud after he has made a 3determination that the information is necessary to detect 4fraud or arson. Claim information may include: 5        (a) Dates and description of accident or loss. 6        (b) Any insurance policy relevant to the accident or 7    loss. 8        (c) Name of the insurance company claims adjustor and 9    claims adjustor supervisor processing or reviewing any 10    claim or claims made under any insurance policy relevant 11    to the accident or loss. 12        (d) Name of claimant's or insured's attorney. 13        (e) Name of claimant's or insured's physician, or any 14    person rendering or purporting to render medical 15    treatment. 16        (f) Description of alleged injuries, damage or loss. 17        (g) History of previous claims made by the claimant or 18    insured. 19        (h) Places of medical treatment. 20        (i) Policy premium payment record. 21        (j) Material relating to the investigation of the 22    accident or loss, including statements of any person, 23    proof of loss, and any other relevant evidence. 24        (k) any facts evidencing fraud or arson.25    The Director shall establish reporting requirements for 26application and premium fraud information reporting by rule.  SB3933- 3 -LRB104 19319 BAB 32765 b1    (2) Any person who has a reasonable belief that an act of 2insurance fraud that is or may be a crime under Illinois law 3has been, is being, or is about to be committed or any person 4who collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning 5insurance fraud that is or may be a crime under Illinois law 6may furnish and disclose any information in the person's 7possession concerning such an act to the Attorney General or 8to an authorized representative of an insurer that requests 9the information for the purpose of detecting, prosecuting, or 10preventing insurance fraud. The Director of Insurance may 11designate one or more data processing organizations or 12governmental agencies to assist him in gathering such 13information and making compilations thereof, and may by rule 14establish the form and procedure for gathering and compiling 15such information. The rules may name any organization or 16agency designated by the Director to provide this service, and 17may in such case provide for a fee to be paid by the reporting 18insurers directly to the designated organization or agency to 19cover any of the costs associated with providing this service. 20After determination by the Director of substantial evidence of 21false or fraudulent claims, fraudulent applications, or 22premium fraud, the information shall be forwarded by the 23Director or the Director's designee to the proper law 24enforcement agency or prosecutor. Insurers shall have access 25to, and may use, the information compiled under the provisions 26of this Section. Insurers shall release information to, and   SB3933- 4 -LRB104 19319 BAB 32765 b1shall cooperate with, any law enforcement agency requesting 2such information.3    In the absence of malice, no insurer, or person who 4furnishes information on its behalf, is liable for damages in 5a civil action or subject to criminal prosecution for any oral 6or written statement made or any other action taken that is 7necessary to supply information required pursuant to this 8Section.9(Source: P.A. 92-233, eff. 1-1-02.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.